Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 1. Administration.
Sec. 38.05.035.
Powers and duties of the director.

The director shall

have general charge and supervision of the division and may exercise the powers specifically delegated to the director; the director may employ and fix the compensation of assistants and employees necessary for the operations of the division; the director is the certifying officer of the division, with the consent of the commissioner, and may approve vouchers for disbursements of money appropriated to the division;

manage, inspect, and control state land and improvements on it belonging to the state and under the jurisdiction of the division;

execute laws, rules, regulations, and orders adopted by the commissioner;

prescribe application procedures and practices for the sale, lease, or other disposition of available land, resources, property, or interest in them;

prescribe fees or service charges, with the consent of the commissioner, for any public service rendered;

under the conditions and limitations imposed by law and the commissioner, issue deeds, leases, or other conveyances disposing of available land, resources, property, or any interests in them;

have jurisdiction over state land, except that land acquired by the Alaska World War II Veterans Board and the Agricultural Loan Board or the departments or agencies succeeding to their respective functions through foreclosure or default; to this end, the director possesses the powers and, with the approval of the commissioner, shall perform the duties necessary to protect the state’s rights and interest in state land, including the taking of all necessary action to protect and enforce the state’s contractual or other property rights;

maintain the records the commissioner considers necessary, administer oaths, and do all things incidental to the authority imposed; the following records and files shall be kept confidential upon request of the person supplying the information:

the name of the person nominating or applying for the sale, lease, or other disposal of land by competitive bidding;

before the announced time of opening, the names of the bidders and the amounts of the bids;

all geological, geophysical, and engineering data supplied, whether or not concerned with the extraction or development of natural resources;

except as provided in AS

38.05.036

, cost data and financial information submitted in support of applications, bonds, leases, and similar items;

applications for rights-of-way or easements;

requests for information or applications by public agencies for land that is being considered for use for a public purpose;

account for the fees, licenses, taxes, or other money received in the administration of this chapter including the sale or leasing of land, identify their source, and promptly transmit them to the proper fiscal department after crediting them to the proper fund; receipts from land application filing fees and charges for copies of maps and records shall be deposited immediately in the general fund of the state by the director;

select and employ or obtain at reasonable compensation cadastral, appraisal, or other professional personnel the director considers necessary for the proper operation of the division;

be the certifying agent of the state to select, accept, and secure by whatever action is necessary in the name of the state, by deed, sale, gift, devise, judgment, operation of law, or other means any land, of whatever nature or interest, available to the state; and be the certifying agent of the state, to select, accept, or secure by whatever action is necessary in the name of the state any land, or title or interest to land available, granted, or subject to being transferred to the state for any purpose;

on request, furnish records, files, and other information related to the administration of AS

38.05.180

to the Department of Revenue for use in forecasting state revenue under or administering AS 43.55, whether or not those records, files, and other information are required to be kept confidential under (8) of this subsection; in the case of records, files, or other information required to be kept confidential under (8) of this subsection, the Department of Revenue shall maintain the confidentiality that the Department of Natural Resources is required to extend to records, files, and other information under (8) of this subsection;

when reasonably possible, give priority to and expedite the processing of an application for a lease or assignment of a lease of state land for development and operation of a gas storage facility, for a right-of-way to a gas storage facility, for a change to the allocation of production within a unit, and for a permit necessary for the operation of a gas storage facility; in this paragraph, “gas storage facility” has the meaning given in AS

31.05.032

;

prepare and submit to the senate secretary and chief clerk of the house of representatives on or before the first day of each regular session of the legislature an annual report in electronic form concerning site lease applications submitted under AS

38.05.083

; in preparing and submitting the report, the director shall

include in the report

a list of all applications pending with the department, including applications for a new lease and applications for renewal, amendment, and assignment of a lease, and the length of time each application has been pending with the department;

for an application that has not been granted, the reason the application has not been granted; and

the number of leases that the director elected not to renew under AS

38.05.070

;

notify the legislature that the report is available.

The director may

delegate the administrative duties, functions, or powers imposed upon the director to a responsible employee in the division;

grant preference rights for the lease or purchase of state land without competitive bid in order to correct errors or omissions of a state or federal administrative agency when inequitable detriment would otherwise result to a diligent claimant or applicant due to situations over which the claimant or applicant had no control; the exercise of this discretionary power operates only to divest the state of its title to or interests in land and may be exercised only

with the express approval of the commissioner; and

if the application for the preference right is filed with the director within three years from

the occurrence of the error or omission;

the date of acquisition by the state of the land; or

the date of a court decision or settlement nullifying a disposal of state land;

grant a preference right to a claimant who shows bona fide improvement of state land or of federal land subsequently acquired by the state and who has in good faith sought to obtain title to the land but who, through error or omission of others occurring within the three years before (A) the application for the preference right, (B) the date of acquisition by the state of the land, or (C) the date of a court decision or settlement nullifying a disposal of state land, has been denied title to it; upon a showing satisfactory to the commissioner, the claimant may lease or purchase the land at the price set on the date of original entry on the land or, if a price was not set at that time at a price determined by the director to fairly represent the value of unimproved land at the time the claim was established, but in no event less than the cost of administration including survey; the error or omission of a predecessor in interest or an agent, administrator, or executor that has clearly prejudiced the claimant may be the basis for granting a preference right;

sell land by lottery for less than the appraised value when, in the judgment of the director, past scarcity of land suitable for private ownership in any particular area has resulted in unrealistic land values;

when the director determines it is in the best interest of the state and will avoid injustice to a person or the heirs or devisees of a person, dispose of land, by direct negotiation to that person who presently uses and who used and made improvements to that land before January 3, 1959, or to the heirs or devisees of the person; the amount paid for the land shall be its fair market value on the date that the person first entered the land, as determined by the director; a parcel of land disposed of under this paragraph shall be of a size consistent with the person’s prior use, but may not exceed five acres;

after consulting with the Board of Agriculture and Conservation (AS

03.09.010

), dispose of an interest in land limited to use for agricultural purposes by lottery;

convey to an adjoining landowner for its fair market value a remnant of land that the director considers unmanageable or a parcel of land created by a highway right-of-way alignment or realignment, or a parcel created by the vacation of a state-owned right-of-way if

the director determines that it is in the best interests of the state;

the parcel

does not exceed the minimum lot size under an applicable zoning code; or

is smaller than 20 acres and is completely enclosed by property owned by the adjacent landowner; and

the director and the platting authority having land use planning jurisdiction agree that conveyance of the parcel to the adjoining landowner will result in boundaries that are convenient for the use of the land by the landowner and compatible with municipal land use plans;

for good cause extend for up to 90 days the time for rental or installment payments by a lessee or purchaser of state land under this chapter if reasonable penalties and interest set by the director are paid;

quitclaim land or an interest in land to the federal government on a determination that the land or the interest in land was wrongfully or erroneously conveyed by the federal government to the state;

negotiate the sale or lease of state land at fair market value to a person who acquired by contract, purchase, or lease rights to improvements on the land from another state agency or who leased the land from another state agency.

A parcel of land may be conveyed under (b) of this section without classification or reclassification under AS

38.05.300

.

A parcel of land described in (b)(7) of this section must be sold at its fair market value as determined by the director on the basis of an appraisal completed as provided in AS

38.05.840

. Nothing in this subsection prevents the sale of land under AS

38.05.055

or

38.05.057

to a person not qualifying as an adjoining landowner if the adjoining landowner declines to purchase the land.

Upon a written finding that the interests of the state will be best served, the director may, with the consent of the commissioner, approve contracts for the sale, lease, or other disposal of available land, resources, property, or interests in them. In approving a contract under this subsection, the director need only prepare a single written finding. In addition to the conditions and limitations imposed by law, the director may impose additional conditions or limitations in the contracts as the director determines, with the consent of the commissioner, will best serve the interests of the state. The preparation and issuance of the written finding by the director are subject to the following:

with the consent of the commissioner and subject to the director’s discretion, for a specific proposed disposal of available land, resources, or property, or of an interest in them, the director, in the written finding,

shall establish the scope of the administrative review on which the director’s determination is based, and the scope of the written finding supporting that determination; the scope of the administrative review and finding may address only reasonably foreseeable, significant effects of the uses proposed to be authorized by the disposal;

may limit the scope of an administrative review and finding for a proposed disposal to

applicable statutes and regulations;

the facts pertaining to the land, resources, or property, or interest in them, that the director finds are material to the determination and that are known to the director or knowledge of which is made available to the director during the administrative review; and

issues that, based on the statutes and regulations referred to in (i) of this subparagraph, on the facts as described in (ii) of this subparagraph, and on the nature of the uses sought to be authorized by the disposal, the director finds are material to the determination of whether the proposed disposal will best serve the interests of the state; and

may, if the project for which the proposed disposal is sought is a multiphased development, limit the scope of an administrative review and finding for the proposed disposal to the applicable statutes and regulations, facts, and issues identified in (B)(i) — (iii) of this paragraph that pertain solely to the disposal phase of the project when

the only uses to be authorized by the proposed disposal are part of that phase;

the disposal is a disposal of oil and gas, or of gas only, and, before the next phase of the project may proceed, public notice and the opportunity to comment are provided under regulations adopted by the department;

the department’s approval is required before the next phase of the project may proceed; and

the department describes its reasons for a decision to phase;

the director shall discuss in the written finding prepared and issued under this subsection the reasons that each of the following was not material to the director’s determination that the interests of the state will be best served:

facts pertaining to the land, resources, or property, or an interest in them other than those that the director finds material under (1)(B)(ii) of this subsection; and

issues based on the statutes and regulations referred to in (1)(B)(i) of this subsection and on the facts described in (1)(B)(ii) of this subsection;

a written finding for an oil and gas lease sale or gas only lease sale under AS

38.05.180

is subject to (g) of this section;

a contract for the sale, lease, or other disposal of available land or an interest in land is not legally binding on the state until the commissioner approves the contract, but if the appraised value is not greater than $50,000 in the case of the sale of land or an interest in land, or $5,000 in the case of the annual rental of land or interest in land, the director may execute the contract without the approval of the commissioner;

public notice requirements relating to the sale, lease, or other disposal of available land or an interest in land for oil and gas, or for gas only, proposed to be scheduled in the five-year oil and gas leasing program under AS

38.05.180(b)

, except for a sale under (6)(F) of this subsection, are as follows:

before a public hearing, if held, or in any case not less than 180 days before the sale, lease, or other disposal of available land or an interest in land, the director shall make available to the public a preliminary written finding that states the scope of the review established under (1)(A) of this subsection and includes the applicable statutes and regulations, the material facts and issues in accordance with (1)(B) of this subsection, and information required by (g) of this section, upon which the determination that the sale, lease, or other disposal will serve the best interests of the state will be based; the director shall provide opportunity for public comment on the preliminary written finding for a period of not less than 60 days;

after the public comment period for the preliminary written finding and not less than 90 days before the sale, lease, or other disposal of available land or an interest in land for oil and gas or for gas only, the director shall make available to the public a final written finding that states the scope of the review established under (1)(A) of this subsection and includes the applicable statutes and regulations, the material facts and issues in accordance with (1) of this subsection, and information required by (g) of this section, upon which the determination that the sale, lease, or other disposal will serve the best interests of the state is based;

before a public hearing, if held, or in any case not less than 21 days before the sale, lease, or other disposal of available land, property, resources, or interests in them other than a sale, lease, or other disposal of available land or an interest in land for oil and gas or for gas only under (5) of this subsection, the director shall make available to the public a written finding that, in accordance with (1) of this subsection, sets out the material facts and applicable statutes and regulations and any other information required by statute or regulation to be considered upon which the determination that the sale, lease, or other disposal will best serve the interests of the state was based; however, a written finding is not required before the approval of

a contract for a negotiated sale authorized under AS

38.05.115

;

a lease of land for a shore fishery site under AS

38.05.082

;

a permit or other authorization revocable by the commissioner;

a mineral claim located under AS

38.05.195

;

a mineral lease issued under AS

38.05.205

;

an exempt oil and gas lease sale or gas only lease sale under AS

38.05.180

(d) of acreage subject to a best interest finding issued within the previous 10 years or a reoffer oil and gas lease sale or gas only lease sale under AS

38.05.180(w)

of acreage subject to a best interest finding issued within the previous 10 years, unless the commissioner determines that substantial new information has become available that justifies a supplement to the most recent best interest finding for the exempt oil and gas lease sale or gas only lease sale acreage and for the reoffer oil and gas lease sale or gas only lease sale acreage; however, for each oil and gas lease sale or gas only lease sale described in this subparagraph, the director shall call for comments from the public; the director’s call for public comments must provide opportunity for public comment for a period of not less than 30 days; if the director determines that a supplement to the most recent best interest finding for the acreage is required under this subparagraph,

the director shall issue the supplement to the best interest finding not later than 90 days before the sale;

not later than 45 days before the sale, the director shall issue a notice describing the interests to be offered, the location and time of the sale, and the terms and conditions of the sale; and

the supplement has the status of a final written best interest finding for purposes of (i) and (l) of this section;

a surface use lease under AS

38.05.255

;

a permit, right-of-way, or easement under AS

38.05.850

;

the director shall include in

a preliminary written finding, if required, a summary of agency and public comments, if any, obtained as a result of contacts with other agencies concerning a proposed disposal or as a result of informal efforts undertaken by the department to solicit public response to a proposed disposal, and the department’s preliminary responses to those comments; and

the final written finding a summary of agency and public comments received and the department’s responses to those comments.

The director shall grant a preference right to the purchase or lease without competitive bid of up to five acres of state land to an individual who has erected a building on the land and used the land for bona fide business purposes for five or more years under a federal permit or without the need for a permit and, after selection by the state, under a state use permit or lease, if the business produced no less than 25 percent of the total income of the applicant for the five years preceding the application to purchase or lease the land. The director shall sell or lease the land at a price determined by the director to represent the current fair market value of the unimproved land but in no event less than the cost of administration including survey if required. If the director determines in a written finding that the purchase or lease of the land would interfere with public use by residents of the area, the director may condition the purchase or lease to mitigate the adverse effects on the public use or may reject the application for the preference right. A lease granted under this subsection may not be for a period in excess of 50 years.

Notwithstanding (e)(1)(A) and (B) of this section, when the director prepares a written finding required under (e) of this section for an oil and gas lease sale or a gas only lease sale scheduled under AS

38.05.180

, the director shall consider and discuss

in a preliminary or final written finding facts that are known to the director at the time of preparation of the finding and that are

material to issues that were raised during the period allowed for receipt of public comment, whether or not material to a matter set out in (B) of this paragraph, and within the scope of the administrative review established by the director under (e)(1) of this section; or

material to the following matters:

property descriptions and locations;

the petroleum potential of the sale area, in general terms;

fish and wildlife species and their habitats in the area;

the current and projected uses in the area, including uses and value of fish and wildlife;

the governmental powers to regulate the exploration, development, production, and transportation of oil and gas or of gas only;

the reasonably foreseeable cumulative effects of exploration, development, production, and transportation for oil and gas or for gas only on the sale area, including effects on subsistence uses, fish and wildlife habitat and populations and their uses, and historic and cultural resources;

lease stipulations and mitigation measures, including any measures to prevent and mitigate releases of oil and hazardous substances, to be included in the leases, and a discussion of the protections offered by these measures;

the method or methods most likely to be used to transport oil or gas from the lease sale area, and the advantages, disadvantages, and relative risks of each;

the reasonably foreseeable fiscal effects of the lease sale and the subsequent activity on the state and affected municipalities and communities, including the explicit and implicit subsidies associated with the lease sale, if any;

the reasonably foreseeable effects of exploration, development, production, and transportation involving oil and gas or gas only on municipalities and communities within or adjacent to the lease sale area; and

the bidding method or methods adopted by the commissioner under AS

38.05.180

; and

the basis for the director’s preliminary or final finding, as applicable, that, on balance, leasing the area would be in the state’s best interest.

In preparing a written finding under (e)(1) of this section, the director may not be required to speculate about possible future effects subject to future permitting that cannot reasonably be determined until the project or proposed use for which a written best interest finding is required is more specifically defined, including speculation about

the exact location and size of an ultimate use and related facilities;

except as otherwise provided in AS

38.05.073

for land suitable for recreational facilities development leasing, the economic feasibility of ultimate development; and

future environmental or other laws that may apply at the time of any future development.

A person who is eligible to file an administrative appeal or a request for reconsideration, as appropriate, under this subsection and who is aggrieved by the final written finding of the director entered under (e)(5) or (6) of this section may, within 20 days after the issuance of the final written finding, file an administrative appeal or request reconsideration of the decision by the commissioner. A person is eligible to file an administrative appeal or a request for reconsideration if the person

meaningfully participated in the process set out in this chapter for receipt of public comment by

submitting written comment during the period for receipt of public comment; or

presenting oral testimony at a public hearing, if a public hearing was held; and

is affected by the final written finding.

An administrative appeal or a request for reconsideration submitted under (i) of this section must specify the written finding complained of and the specific basis upon which it is challenged. The commissioner shall grant or deny the administrative appeal or reconsideration request within 30 days after issuance of the final written finding. Failure of the commissioner to act on the request for reconsideration within this period is a denial of the request for reconsideration and a final administrative decision for purposes of appeal to the superior court.

If an administrative appeal or a request for reconsideration is granted, the commissioner may order the director to issue a new final written finding as may be required under the circumstances.

A person may appeal a final written finding issued under (e)(5) or (6) of this section to the superior court, but only if the person was eligible to request, and did request, an administrative appeal or reconsideration of that finding under (i) of this section. The person shall initiate the appeal within 30 days from the date that the decision on administrative appeal or reconsideration is mailed or otherwise distributed, or the date the request for reconsideration is considered denied by the commissioner’s failure to act on the request, whichever is earlier. The points on appeal are limited to those presented to the commissioner in the person’s administrative appeal or request for reconsideration.

For purposes of appeal under (l) of this section, the burden is upon the party seeking review to establish the invalidity of the finding.

The director may not deny an application for a lease or assignment of a lease of state land for the development and operation of a gas storage facility solely because the gas storage facility would be used exclusively or primarily to store gas owned by the owner or operator of the gas storage facility. In this subsection, “gas storage facility” has the meaning given in AS

31.05.032

.

The director may approve exploration or development for all or part of an area previously approved for oil and gas or gas only leasing under (e) of this section. An approval applies to exploration or development commencing during a period for up to 10 years, as specified by the director in the approval. When authorizing exploration or development under this subsection, the department shall provide public notice and the opportunity to comment using the methods described in AS

38.05.945(b)

and (c). The approval authorizes a lessee to begin exploration or development during the period specified in the approval, subject to the lessee receiving other authorizations required from the department or other state, local, or federal agencies. Once a lessee begins exploration or development on a lease or group of leases, the approval for exploration under this subsection or the approval for development under this subsection remains valid for the term of the lease. This subsection does not relieve lessees of any statutory, regulatory, or lease obligations, including any obligations to submit for approval plans of operation, of exploration, or of development.

Where there is a valid municipal entitlement selection on state land under AS

29.65.010

—

29.65.030

that has a state-issued land lease that has been issued competitively under AS

38.05.070

and before the decision to approve the municipal entitlement land selection, the director shall grant a preference right to purchase without further competitive bid of up to five acres of the state land to an individual who has erected a building approved by a lease on the state land and used the land for bona fide business purposes for 10 or more years under a state lease, if the business produced not less than 25 percent of the total income of the applicant for the 10 years preceding the application to purchase the land. An application for a preference right under this section must be filed with the director within 120 days after notice to the lessee of the municipal entitlement land selection. If the director grants the preference right, the director shall sell the land at a price determined by the director to represent the current fair market value of the unimproved land determined by an appraisal under AS

38.05.840

and a survey, both at the cost of the applicant. If the director determines that the purchase of the land would interfere with public use by residents of the area, the director may condition the purchase to mitigate the adverse effects on the public in the written finding under (e) of this section or may reject the application if those effects cannot be avoided or mitigated. If the preference right application is approved, the amount of land within the overall municipal entitlement under AS

29.65.010

—

29.65.030

shall be reduced by the amount of land covered under this section; however, subject to appropriation, the revenue from the purchase of the parcel will be given to the municipality if the municipal entitlement land selection is approved.

In (f) and (p) of this section,

“building” means a permanent type of structure not less than 500 square feet in size with solid walls, foundation, and roof;

“business purposes” means a purpose consistent with the classification of the land at the time the land was entered.

History.

(§ 5 art II ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1960; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 61 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 194 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 164 SLA 1972; am §§ 2, 3 ch 257 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 176 SLA 1978; am § 15 ch 181 SLA 1978; am § 20 ch 182 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1980; am §§ 9 — 13 ch 113 SLA 1981; am §§ 19, 20, 88 ch 152 SLA 1984; am §§ 9, 10 ch 75 SLA 1987; am §§ 1, 2 ch 124 SLA 1990; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 38 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 138 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 140 SLA 1996; am §§ 8, 9 ch 56 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 2000; am § 26 ch 81 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 101 SLA 2001; am §§ 10, 11 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 31 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 1 SSSLA 2007; am §§ 3, 4 ch 16 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 2013; am §§ 1, 2 ch 71 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2021)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1981, in paragraph (b)(7), the word “convey” was substituted for “dispose” at the beginning of the paragraph and in subsection (d), the words “of land” were added following “parcel” to correct manifest errors in ch. 113, SLA 1981.

Subparagraph (e)(6)(H) was originally enacted as subparagraph (e)(6)(I). Relettered in 1996 to reflect the merging of former subparagraph (H) into existing subparagraph (G) in § 1, ch. 138, SLA 1996.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings related to the enactment of (o) of this section, see sec. 1, ch. 13, SLA 2013, in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision regarding conveyance of real property used as a shooting range located at Tok to the Tok Shooters Association, see sec. 1, ch. 22, SLA 2019.

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For applicability of chapter, see 11 AAC 51, art. 1.

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

For land records system, see 11 AAC 53, art. 1.

For survey and platting standards, see 11 AAC 53, art. 2.

For purchase by contract, see 11 AAC 54, art. 2.

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

For use limitation by classification, see 11 AAC 58, art. 1.

For short title and definitions, see 11 AAC 58, art. 4.

For grazing leases, see 11 AAC 60.

For aquatic farmsite permits and leases, see 11 AAC 63.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 66, art. 1.

For administrative provisions, see 11 AAC 67, art. 1.

For preference right sales, see 11 AAC 67, art. 3.

For sale or grant by lottery, see 11 AAC 67, art. 4.

For homesteads, see 11 AAC 67, art. 6A.

For disposal of agricultural interest, see 11 AAC 67, art. 7.

For remote recreational cabin sites, see 11 AAC 67, art. 8B.

For installment contracts, see 11 AAC 67, art. 9.

For disposal by quitclaim to federal government, see 11 AAC 67, art. 11A.

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For timber and material sale contracts and operations, see 11 AAC 71, art. 2.

For unbranded or abandoned timber property sales, see 11 AAC 71, art. 4.

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

For competitive bidding, see 11 AAC 82, art. 4.

For records and reports, see 11 AAC 82, art. 8.

For exploration licensing, see 11 AAC 82, art. 9.

For unitization, see 11 AAC 83, art. 3.

For geothermal leasing, see 11 AAC 84, art. 7.

For geothermal unitization, see 11 AAC 84, art. 8.

For staking, recording and maintaining claims and leasehold locations, see 11 AAC 86, art. 2.

For converted MTRSC locations, see 11 AAC 86, art. 3.

For upland mining leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 4.

For offshore permits and leases, see 11 AAC 86, art. 6.

For mining production royalty, see 11 AAC 86, art. 9.

For exploratory operations, see 11 AAC 87, art. 2.

For drilling of geothermal wells, see 11 AAC 87, art. 3.

For practice and procedure, see 11 AAC 88.

For exploration incentive credit, see 11 AAC 89.

For appropriation and use of water, see 11 AAC 93, art. 2.

For dam safety, see 11 AAC 93, art. 3.

For applicant qualifications, see 11 AAC 94, art. 1.

For additional provisions for seismic exploration and stratigraphic tests, see 11 AAC 96, art. 2.

For management of Alaska mental health trust land, see 11 AAC 99.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 8, 2014, in (f), deleted the last sentence, which defined “business purposes”; added (p) and (q).

The 2021 amendment, effective September 13, 2021, added (a)(14), and made a related change.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 13, SLA 2013 (CSHB 129(FIN)), see 2013 House Journal 329.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The division of lands is the proper agency for acceptance of title to land transferred by the federal government.
The division of aviation in the (former) Department of Public Works possesses the authority to manage the granted land for airport and directly related purposes while the division of lands possesses the authority to manage the land for other public purposes.
April 14, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.

There is no express authority that would allow the division of natural resources to disclaim lands wrongfully conveyed by the federal government to the state.
Paragraph (b)(2) already provides a procedure for correcting mistakes made by the federal government. August 4, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen.

Probably the best way for the state to implement the settlement procedures stipulated to under Aguilar v. United States, 474 F. Supp. 840 (D. Alaska 1979), under which the state was to quitclaim back to the federal government lands which had been erroneously conveyed to the state, was to enact new legislation specifically authorizing such conveyances. August 4, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen. (rendered prior to 1984 amendment adding paragraph (b)(9)).

The department cannot issue a patent to state land without a restriction required by the director’s AS

38.05.035(a)(14)

(now see subsection (e)) best interest finding and the amended disposal brochure although the land sale contract failed to mention the restriction.
December 28, 1983, Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Natural Resources may lawfully require that all the co-lessees of a lease have ratified a unit agreement before the department will commit that lease to the unit. July 11, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

The director of land and water management has the authority to grant a preference right to one party under subsection (b) for the sale of land that is subject to a preference right held by another party under AS

38.05.068

. November 14, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

The state could not directly sell a parcel of property to a historical society for use as a cemetery without public auction or indirectly to the society through a third party pursuant to paragraph (b)(5).
However, the parcel could be leased to the society for a term not to exceed 55 years, renewable indefinitely at 55 year intervals at the discretion of the director of the division of lands.
August 6, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.